Missouri, session 2026, HB2597.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 376, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 376.684, to read as follows:
376.684. 1. As used in this section, unless the context indicates otherwise, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Ambulance provider", any ambulance service, as defined in section 190.100.
The term "ambulance provider" shall not include an air ambulance provider;
(2) "Clean claim", a claim that has no defect or impropriety, including any lack
of required substantiating documentation or particular circumstance requiring special
treatment that prevents timely payment from being made on the claim;
(3) "Covered services", those emergency ambulance services that an enrollee is
entitled to receive under the terms of a health benefit plan;
(4) "Enrollee", the same meaning given to the term in section 376.1350;
(5) "Health benefit plan", the same meaning given to the term in section
376.1350;
(6) "Health carrier", the same meaning given to the term in section 376.1350;
(7) "Out-of-network ambulance provider", an ambulance provider that does not
contract with the health carrier of the enrollee receiving the covered services.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2597 2
2. The minimum allowable reimbursement rate under any health benefit plan
issued by any health carrier to an out-of-network ambulance provider for providing
emergency services shall be:
(1) At the rates set or approved, whether in contract or ordinance, by a local
governmental entity in the jurisdiction in which the covered services originate, or as
provided for in section 190.105; or
(2) In the absence of rates as provided in subdivision (1) of this subsection, three
hundred twenty-five percent of the current published rate for ambulance services, as
established by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services under Title XVIII of the
Social Security Act for the same service provided in the same geographic area, or the
ambulance provider's billed charges, whichever is less.
3. Payment made in compliance with this section shall be considered payment in
full for the covered services provided, except for any co-payment, coinsurance,
deductible, and other cost-sharing amounts required to be paid by the enrollee. An
ambulance provider is prohibited from billing the enrollee for any additional amounts
for paid covered services.
4. All co-payment, coinsurance, deductible, and other cost-sharing amounts
provided by subsection 3 of this section shall not exceed the in-network co-payment,
coinsurance, deductible, and other cost-sharing amounts for the covered services
received by the enrollee.
5. A health carrier shall, within thirty days after receipt of a clean claim for
covered services, promptly remit payment for ambulance services directly to the
ambulance provider and shall not send payment to an enrollee.
6. If the claim is not a clean claim, the health carrier shall, within thirty days
after receipt of the claim, send a written notice acknowledging the date of the receipt of
the claim and shall specify:
(1) That the health carrier is declining to pay all or part of the claim and the
specific reason or reasons for the denial; or
(2) That additional information is necessary to determine if all or part of the
claim is payable and the specific additional information that is required.
7. To the extent that this section conflicts with section 376.690 or any other
provision of law, this section shall prevail.
✔